Hawaii statutes.
§200-2.5 Disposition
of state boating facility properties. (a) Notwithstanding any
law to the contrary, the board may lease fast lands and submerged lands within
an existing state boating facility by public auction, a request for proposals,
or by direct negotiation pursuant to section 171-59 and chapter 190D, for
private development, management, and operation; provided that any lease of fast
lands or submerged lands pursuant to a request for proposals shall be subject
to section 200-2.6, regardless to which state boating facility the fast or
submerged lands are attached.

As used in this section, the
term "state boating facility" means a state small boat harbor,
launching ramp, offshore mooring, pier, wharf, landing, or any other area under
the jurisdiction of the department pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The permissible
uses under any lease disposed of under this section shall be consistent with
the purpose for which the land was set aside by the governor pursuant to
section 171‑11. Permissible uses may include any use that will
complement or support the ocean-recreation or maritime activities of state
boating facilities.

(c) Disposition of
public lands of state boating facilities constructed, maintained, and operated
in accordance with this chapter shall not exceed a maximum term of sixty-five
years.

(d) All revenues due to
the State derived from leases of state boating facilities shall be deposited in
the boating special fund.

(e) The department
shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 to implement this section. [L
2001, c 299, §2; am L 2011, c 197, §4]

Note

Requirement for leases. L 2011, c 197, §8.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next